Hawaii statutes.
[§159-57] Failure to obey summons.
(a) Any person who fails to appear at the place and time specified in the
citation and summons issued to that person by the division head or the division
head's designee upon the person's citation for violation of the meat inspection
laws or rules shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, fined not
more than $500 or imprisoned not more than six months, or both.

(b) If any person fails to comply with a
citation and summons issued to that person, the division head or the division
head's designee shall cause a complaint to be entered against the person and
secure the issuance of a warrant for that person's arrest.

(c) When a complaint is made to any
prosecuting officer of the violation of any provision of this chapter or any
rule adopted thereunder, the division head or the division head's designee who
issued the complaint and summons shall subscribe to it under oath. [L 1986, c
206, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next